Vermont, session 2025-2026, S248.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 61A is added to read:
CHAPTER 61A. DATA PRIVACY
Subchapter 1. Genetic Information Privacy
§ 2411. SHORT TITLE AND DEFINITIONS
(a) This subchapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the “Genetic
Information Privacy Act.”
VT LEG #385797 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.248
2026 Page 2 of 16
(b) As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Affirmative authorization” means an action that demonstrates an
intentional decision by a consumer.
(2) “Biological sample” means any material part of the human,
discharge therefrom, or derivative thereof, such as tissue, blood, urine, or
saliva, known to contain deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA).
(3) “Consumer” means an individual who is a Vermont resident.
(4) “Dark pattern” means a user interface designed or manipulated with
the substantial effect of subverting or impairing user autonomy, decision
making, or choice.
(5) “Direct-to-consumer genetic testing company” means an entity that:
(A) sells, markets, interprets, or otherwise offers consumer-initiated
genetic testing products or services directly to consumers;
(B) analyzes genetic data obtained from a consumer, except to the
extent that the analysis is performed by a person licensed in the healing arts for
diagnosis or treatment of a medical condition; or
(C) collects, uses, maintains, or discloses genetic data that is:
(i) collected or derived from a direct-to-consumer genetic testing
product or service; or
(ii) directly provided by a consumer.
VT LEG #385797 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.248
2026 Page 3 of 16
(6) “Disclose,” “disclosing,” or “disclosure” means to solicit, sell,
assign, transfer, give, provide, or trade, whether or not for valuable
consideration.
(7) “Express consent” means a consumer’s affirmative authorization to
grant permission in response to a clear, meaningful, and prominent notice
regarding the collection, use, maintenance, or disclosure of genetic data for a
specific purpose. Express consent cannot be inferred from inaction.
Agreement obtained through the use of dark patterns does not constitute
express consent.
(8)(A) “Genetic data” means any data, regardless of its format, that
results from the analysis of a biological sample from a consumer, or from
another element enabling equivalent information to be obtained, and concerns
genetic material. Genetic material includes deoxyribonucleic acids (DNA),
ribonucleic acids (RNA), genes, chromosomes, alleles, genomes, alterations or
modifications to DNA or RNA, single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs),
uninterpreted data that results from the analysis of the biological sample, and
any information extrapolated, derived, or inferred therefrom.
(B) “Genetic data” does not include deidentified data. For purposes
of this subdivision (B), “deidentified data” means data that cannot be used to
infer information about, or otherwise be linked to, a particular individual,
provided that the business that possesses the information:
VT LEG #385797 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.248
2026 Page 4 of 16
(i) takes reasonable measures to ensure that the information cannot
be associated with a consumer or household;
(ii) publicly commits to maintain and use the information only in
deidentified form and not to attempt to reidentify the information, except that
the business may periodically attempt to reidentify the information solely for
the purpose of determining whether its deidentification processes satisfy the
requirements of this subdivision (B), on the express condition that the business
does not use or disclose any information reidentified in this process and
destroys the reidentified information upon completion of that periodic
assessment; and
(iii) contractually obligates any recipients of the information to
take reasonable measures to ensure that the information cannot be associated
with a consumer or household and to commit to maintaining and using the
information only in deidentified form and not to reidentify the information.
(C) “Genetic data” does not include data or a biological sample to the
extent that data or a biological sample is collected, used, maintained, and
disclosed:
(i) exclusively for scientific research conducted by an investigator
with an institution that holds an assurance with the U.S. Department of Health
and Human Services pursuant to 45 C.F.R. Part 46; or
VT LEG #385797 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.248
2026 Page 5 of 16
(ii) in compliance with all applicable federal and State laws and
regulations for the protection of human subjects in research, including the:
(I) Common Rule, 45 C.F.R. Part 46;
(II) U.S. Food and Drug Administration regulations pursuant to
21 C.F.R. Parts 50 and 56; and
(III) Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C.
§ 1232g.
(9) “Genetic testing” means any laboratory test of a biological sample
from a consumer for the purpose of determining information concerning
genetic material contained within the biological sample, or any information
extrapolated, derived, or inferred therefrom.
(10) “Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, association,
business, business trust, or legal representative of an organization.
(11)(A) “Publicly available information” means information that is
made available through federal, state, or local government records or to the
general public from widely distributed media.
(B) “Publicly available information” does not include:
(i) biometric data collected by a business about a consumer
without the consumer’s knowledge;
VT LEG #385797 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.248
2026 Page 6 of 16
(ii) information that is collated and combined to create a consumer
profile that is made available to a user of a publicly available website either in
exchange for payment or free of charge;
(iii) information that is made available for sale;
(iv) an inference that is generated from the information described
in subdivision (ii) or (iii) of this subdivision (11)(B);
(v) any obscene visual depiction, as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 1460;
(vi) personal data that is created through the combination of
personal data with publicly available information;
(vii) genetic data, unless otherwise made publicly available by the
consumer to whom the information pertains;
(viii) information provided by a consumer on a website or online
service made available to all members of the public, for free or for a fee, where
the consumer has maintained a reasonable expectation of privacy in the
information, such as by restricting the information to a specific audience; or
(ix) intimate images, authentic or computer generated, known to
be nonconsensual.
(12) “Service provider” means a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited
liability company, corporation, association, or other legal entity that is
involved in the collection, transportation, and analysis of the consumer’s
biological sample or extracted genetic material:
VT LEG #385797 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.248
2026 Page 7 of 16
(A) on behalf of the direct-to-consumer genetic testing company;
(B) on behalf of any other company that collects, uses, maintains, or
discloses genetic data collected or derived from a direct-to-consumer genetic
testing product or service; or
(C) that is directly provided by a consumer.
§ 2412. REQUIREMENTS
(a) Privacy terms and consent. To safeguard the privacy, confidentiality,
security, and integrity of a consumer’s genetic data, a direct-to-consumer
genetic testing company shall:
(1) provide clear and complete information regarding the company’s
policies and procedures for the collection, use, maintenance, and disclosure, as
applicable, of genetic data by making available to a consumer all of the
following:
(A) a summary of its privacy practices, written in plain language, that
includes information about the company’s collection, use, maintenance, and
disclosure, as applicable, of genetic data;
(B) a prominent and easily accessible privacy notice that includes, at
a minimum, complete information about the company’s data collection,
consent, use, access, disclosure, maintenance, transfer, security, and retention
and deletion practices; and
VT LEG #385797 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.248
2026 Page 8 of 16
(C) a notice that the consumer’s deidentified genetic or phenotypic
information may be shared with or disclosed to third parties for research
purposes in accordance with 45 C.F.R. Part 46; and
(2) obtain a consumer’s express consent for the collection, use, and
disclosure of the consumer’s genetic data, including, at a minimum, separate
and express consent for each of the following:
(A) the use of the genetic data collected through the genetic testing
product or service offered to the consumer, including:
(i) who has access to genetic data;
(ii) how genetic data may be shared; and
(iii) the specific purposes for which the data will be collected,
used, and disclosed;
(B) the storage of a consumer’s biological sample after the initial
testing requested by the consumer has been fulfilled;
(C) each use of genetic data or the biological sample beyond the
primary purpose of the genetic testing or service and inherent contextual uses;
(D) each transfer or disclosure of the consumer’s genetic data or
biological sample to a third party other than a service provider, including the
name of the third party to which the consumer’s genetic data or biological
sample will be transferred or disclosed and the intended purpose of said
transfer, except that a company shall not require a consumer to expressly
VT LEG #385797 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.248
2026 Page 9 of 16
consent to the actions in this subdivision (D) in order to receive the services
ordered from the company by the consumer; and
(E) the marketing or facilitation of marketing to a consumer based on
the consumer’s genetic data or the marketing or facilitation of marketing by a
third party based upon the consumer having ordered, purchased, received, or
used a genetic testing product or service.
(b) Marketing exception.
(1) Subdivision (a)(2)(E) of this section does not require a direct-to-
consumer genetic testing company to obtain a consumer’s express consent to
market to the consumer on the company’s own website or mobile application
based upon the consumer having ordered, purchased, received, or used a
genetic testing product or service from that company if the content of the
advertisement does not depend upon any information specific to that consumer.
Nothing in this subdivision alters, limits, or negates the requirements of any
other antidiscrimination law or targeted advertising law.
(2) Any advertisement of a third-party product or service presented to a
consumer pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection or subdivision
(a)(2)(E) of this section shall be prominently labeled as advertising content and
be accompanied by the name of any third party that has contributed to the
placement of the advertising. If applicable, the advertisement also shall clearly
indicate that the advertised product or service, and any associated claims, have
VT LEG #385797 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.248
2026 Page 10 of 16
not been vetted or endorsed by the direct-to-consumer genetic testing
company.
(c) Revoking consent.
(1) A direct-to-consumer genetic testing company that is subject to the
requirements in subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall provide effective
mechanisms, without any unnecessary steps, for a consumer to revoke consent
after it is given, at least one of which utilizes the primary medium through
which the company communicates with consumers.
(2) If a consumer revokes consent pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection, the direct-to-consumer genetic testing company shall:
(A) honor the consumer’s consent revocation as soon as practicable,
but not later than 30 days after the individual revokes consent; and
(B) if the revocation is related to the storage or use of a consumer’s
biological sample, destroy the consumer’s biological sample not later than 30
days after receipt of the revocation of consent.
(d) Data security and access.
(1) A direct-to-consumer genetic testing company shall:
(A) implement and maintain reasonable security procedures and
practices to protect a consumer’s genetic data against unauthorized access,
destruction, use, modification, or disclosure; and
VT LEG #385797 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.248
2026 Page 11 of 16
(B) develop procedures and practices to enable a consumer to easily:
(i) access the consumer’s genetic data;
(ii) delete the consumer’s account and genetic data, except for
genetic data that is required to be retained by the company to comply with
applicable legal and regulatory requirements; and
(iii) request to have and have the consumer’s biological sample
destroyed.
(2) Genetic data and biometric samples of consumers shall not be stored
within the territorial boundaries of any country currently sanctioned in any way
by the U.S. Office of Foreign Assets Control or designated as a foreign
adversary under 15 C.F.R. § 7.4(a).
(3) Genetic data or biometric data of consumers shall only be transferred
or stored outside the United States with the express consent of the consumer.
(e) Contracts. A contract between a direct-to-consumer genetic testing
company and a service provider shall prohibit the service provider from:
(1) retaining, using, or disclosing the biological sample, genetic data, or
any information regarding the identity of the consumer, including whether that
consumer has solicited or received genetic testing, for a commercial purpose
other than providing the services specified in the contract with the business;
and
VT LEG #385797 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.248
2026 Page 12 of 16
(2) associating or combining the biological sample, genetic data, or any
information regarding the identity of the consumer, including whether that
consumer has solicited or received genetic testing, with information the service
provider has received from or on behalf of another person or persons, or has
collected from its own interaction with consumers or as required by law.
(f) Discrimination. A person or public entity shall not discriminate against
a consumer because the consumer exercised any of the consumer’s rights under
this subchapter by:
(1) denying goods, services, or benefits to the consumer;
(2) charging different prices or rates for goods or services, including
through the use of discounts or other incentives, or imposing penalties;
(3) providing a different level or quality of goods, services, or benefits
to the consumer;
(4) suggesting that the consumer will receive a different price or rate for
goods, services, or benefits, or a different level or quality of goods, services, or
benefits; and
(5) considering the consumer’s exercise of rights under this subchapter
as a basis for suspicion of criminal wrongdoing or unlawful conduct.
(g) Nondisclosure. Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, a
direct-to-consumer genetic testing company shall not disclose a consumer’s
genetic data to any entity that is responsible for administering or making
VT LEG #385797 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.248
2026 Page 13 of 16
decisions regarding health insurance, life insurance, long-term care insurance,
disability insurance, or employment, or to any entity that provides advice to an
entity that is responsible for performing those functions.
§ 2413. ENFORCEMENT
(a) A direct-to-consumer genetic testing company or service provider that
violates this subchapter or rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter commits
an unfair and deceptive act in commerce in violation of section 2453 of this
title.
(b) The Attorney General shall have the same authority under this
subchapter to make rules, conduct civil investigations, bring civil actions, and
enter into assurances of discontinuance against any person as provided under
chapter 63 of this title.
§ 2414. APPLICABILITY
(a) The provisions of this subchapter shall not reduce a direct-to-consumer
genetic testing company’s duties, obligations, requirements, or standards under
any applicable State and federal laws for the protection of privacy and security.
(b) In the event of a conflict between the provisions of this subchapter and
any other law, the provisions of the law that afford the greatest protection for
the right of privacy for consumers shall control.
VT LEG #385797 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.248
2026 Page 14 of 16
(c) This subchapter shall not apply to any of the following:
(1) protected health information that is collected, maintained, used, or
disclosed by a covered entity or business associate governed by the privacy,
security, and breach notification rules issued by the U.S. Department of Health
and Human Services, 45 C.F.R. Parts 160 and 164, established pursuant to the
Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-
191, and the Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health
Act, Pub. L. No. 111-5;
(2) a covered entity governed by the privacy, security, and breach
notification rules issued by the U.S. Department of Health and Human
Services, 45 C.F.R. Parts 160 and 164, established pursuant to the Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191,
and the Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act,
Title XIII of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Pub. L.
No. 111-5, to the extent that the provider or covered entity maintains, uses, and
discloses genetic information in the same manner as medical information or
protected health information, as described in subdivision (1) of this subsection;
(3) a business associate of a covered entity governed by the privacy,
security, and data breach notification rules issued by the U.S. Department of
Health and Human Services, 45 C.F.R. Parts 160 and 164, established pursuant
to the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L.
VT LEG #385797 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.248
2026 Page 15 of 16
No. 104-191, and the Health Information Technology for Economic and
Clinical Health Act, Title XIII of the American Recovery and Reinvestment
Act of 2009, Pub. L. No. 111-5, to the extent that the business associate
maintains, uses, and discloses genetic information in the same manner as
medical information or protected health information, as described in
subdivision (1) of this subsection;
(4) scientific research or educational activities conducted by a public or
private nonprofit postsecondary educational institution that holds an assurance
with the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to 45 C.F.R.
Part 46, to the extent that the scientific research and educational activities
conducted by that institution comply with all applicable federal and State laws
and regulations for the protection of human subjects in research, including the
Common Rule pursuant to 45 C.F.R. Part 46, U.S. Food and Drug
Administration regulations pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Parts 50 and 56, and the
Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g;
(5) tests conducted exclusively to diagnose whether an individual has a
specific disease, to the extent that all persons involved in the conduct of the
test maintain, use, and disclose genetic information in the same manner as
medical information or protected health information, as described in
subdivision (1) of this subsection; and
VT LEG #385797 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.248
2026 Page 16 of 16
(6) genetic data used or maintained by an employer, or disclosed by an
employee to an employer, to the extent that the use, maintenance, or disclosure
of that data is necessary to comply with a local, State, or federal workplace
health and safety ordinance, law, or regulation.
(d) Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to affect access to
publicly available information.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385797 v.1